Utah statutes.
63M-1-2503.   Duties related to health system reform.

The Governor's Office of Economic Development shall coordinate the efforts of the Office of Consumer Health Services, the Department of Health, the Insurance Department, and the Department of Workforce Services to assist the Legislature with developing the state's strategic plan for health system reform described in Section 63M-1-2505.

